Arkansas, session 2025, SB129.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby established
for the University of Arkansas at Monticello for the 2025-2026 fiscal year,
the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item No. of Fiscal Year
No. Title Employees 2025-2026
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ADMINISTRATIVE POSITIONS
(1) Chancellor 1 $290,076
(2) Dean, Forest Resources/Dir. AFRC 1 $228,689
(3) Project/Program Administrator 13
Executive Project/Program Director $207,294
*HAR032*
01/27/2025 1:30:04 PM HAR032

SB129
Exec. Project/Program Manager $181,097
Sr. Project/Program Director $167,382
Project/Program Director $135,750
Project/Program Manager $123,020
Executive Assistant $115,000
Project/Program Specialist $106,139
(4) Provost 1 $201,301
(5) IT Pool 7
Network Engineer $200,973
Information Systems Manager $128,994
Computer Network Coordinator $128,780
Technical Support Staff $123,019
Coordinator, Academic Computing $121,571
Coord., Administrative Computing $121,570
Coordinator of Information Technology $119,967
Website Developer/Programmer $119,967
System Programmer/Web Developer $118,592
Computer Systems Mgr. $108,987
Database Administrator $106,607
Systems Administrator $105,547
Information Systems Security Specialist $103,579
Institution Information Technology Coord. $101,489
Assistant Database Administrator $97,665
Computer Support Manager $97,585
Information Systems Coordinator $97,585
Senior Software Support Specialist $97,585
Systems Specialist $97,585
Information Technology Manager $96,408
Network Support Specialist $93,831
Senior Software Support Analyst $93,831
Tech Support/Systems Admin. $92,374
Tech Support/Applications Support $92,374
Information Systems Business Manager $90,223
Security Analyst $90,223
Systems Analyst $90,223
Information Technology Specialist $88,339
01/27/2025 1:30:04 PM HAR032

SB129
Computer Support Coordinator $86,753
Software Support Analyst $86,753
Systems Applications Supervisor $86,753
Computer Operations Coordinator $83,416
Systems Coordination Analyst $83,416
PC Support Specialist $81,860
Computer Support Specialist $80,208
Database Analyst $80,208
Digital Broadcast Specialist $77,123
Network Support Analyst $77,123
Website Developer $77,123
Information Systems Analyst $74,157
Information Systems Security Analyst $74,157
Computer Support Analyst $74,157
Software Support Specialist $71,305
Telecommunications Supervisor $71,305
Media Specialist $69,975
Computer Support Technician $68,562
Help Desk Specialist $68,562
Computer Operator $65,925
Network Analyst $65,925
Telecommunications Specialist $65,925
Multimedia Specialist $62,208
Information Technology Assistant $58,608
Computer Lab Technician $56,353
Multimedia Technician $51,130
Audiovisual Laboratory Assistant $47,272
(6) Vice Chan. for Finance & Administration 1 $194,320
(7) Vice Chan. for Advancement/Development 1 $188,485
(8) Vice Chancellor for Student Affairs 1 $188,485
(9) Director of the Center for Forest Bus. 1 $174,852
(10) Dean 7 $173,915
(11) Director of Information Technology 1 $145,572
(12) Registrar 1 $142,888
(13) Director of Physical Plant 1 $142,721
(14) Assoc. Vice Chan. for Finance & Admin. 2 $141,997
01/27/2025 1:30:04 PM HAR032

SB129
(15) Assoc. Vice Chan. for Acad. Affairs 2 $141,997
(16) Assistant to the Chancellor 1 $141,997
(17) Director of University Relations 1 $132,577
(18) Director of Institutional Research 1 $132,577
(19) Director of Engineering Systems 1 $128,780
(20) Director of Adm. & Enrollment Mgmt. 1 $126,225
(21) Director of Student Financial Aid 1 $126,225
(22) Director of Alumni Services 1 $121,922
(23) Director of Community Education 1 $121,922
(24) Director of Grants 1 $121,922
(25) Director of Special Events 1 $121,922
(26) Budget Director 1 $120,948
(27) Asst. V-C of Stud. Aff./Dean of Students 1 $119,869
(28) Director of University Police 1 $118,692
(29) Director of Administrative Services 1 $116,274
(30) Asst. Dir. Info. Tech. System Mgmt. 2 $106,740
(31) Director of Distance Learning 1 $106,740
(32) Director of Recruitment 1 $106,740
(33) Program Technician 3 $106,136
(34) Administrator of Grants and Contracts 1 $105,718
(35) Director of Student Activities 1 $100,904
(36) Counselor 1 $100,884
(37) Director of Academic Advising 1 $98,669
(38) Director of Disability Services 1 $98,669
(39) Dir. of Retention Services 1 $98,669
(40) Assistant Controller 1 $95,766
(41) Fiscal Support Pool 9
Fiscal Support Manager $92,082
Fiscal Support Supervisor $75,685
Accountant II $72,774
Accountant I $69,975
Fiscal Support Analyst $67,284
Fiscal Support Specialist $59,815
Accounting Technician $55,302
Fiscal Support Technician $51,130
(42) Public Safety Pool 10
01/27/2025 1:30:04 PM HAR032

SB129
HE Public Safety Commander III $90,223
Director Public Safety I $88,541
HE Public Safety Commander II $86,753
HE Public Safety Commander I $83,416
HE Public Safety Supervisor $74,157
Public Safety Officer $71,305
Public Safety Officer II $65,925
Security Officer Supervisor $62,208
Public Safety/Security Officer $56,353
HE Public Safety Dispatcher $47,272
Parking Control Supv. $47,272
Security Officer $47,272
Parking Control Officer $45,455
Watchman $38,855
(43) Campus Maintenance Supervisor 2 $78,713
(44) Payroll Services Coordinator 1 $78,713
(45) Procurement Coordinator 1 $78,713
(46) Academic Advisor 5 $77,184
(47) Skilled Trades Pool 14
Skilled Trades Foreman $74,157
Skilled Trades Supervisor $71,305
Skilled Tradesman $68,562
Skilled Trades Helper $52,101
Apprentice Tradesman $46,319
(48) Coord. of Sports Information 1 $72,774
(49) Human Resources Analyst 1 $72,774
(50) Research Project Analyst 1 $72,774
(51) HEI Program Coordinator 1 $69,975
(52) Occupational Safety Coord. 1 $69,975
(53) Administrative Support Pool 27
Administrative Assistant $67,284
Administrative Analyst $67,284
Administrative Support Supervisor $62,208
Administrative Specialist III $59,815
Administration Support Specialist $59,815
Administrative Specialist II $53,175
01/27/2025 1:30:04 PM HAR032

SB129
Administrative Support Specialist $53,175
Administrative Specialist I $47,272
Extra Help Assistant $38,855
(54) Assistant Registrar 2 $67,284
(55) Financial Aid Analyst 5 $67,284
(56) Library Support Pool 4
Library Supervisor $67,284
Library Specialist $57,515
Library Technician $53,175
Library Support Assistant $49,164
(57) Boiler Operator 4 $64,696
(58) Commercial Graphic Artist 1 $64,696
(59) Warehouse Manager 1 $64,696
(60) Student Recruit Specialist 3 $62,208
(61) Special Events Coordinator 1 $59,815
(62) Coordinator of Housekeeping 1 $57,515
(63) Heavy Equipment Operator 1 $53,175
(64) Cashier 2 $51,130
(65) Maintenance Assistant 5 $51,130
(66) Institutional Services Shift Supv. 1 $49,164
(67) Warehouse Worker 1 $47,272
(68) Equipment Operator 4 $45,455
(69) Institutional Services Supervisor 2 $43,706
(70) Institutional Services Assistant 19 $42,025
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(71) Chair Agri. & Dir. SEREC 1 $228,689
(72) Department Chairperson 4 $160,134
(73) Faculty 41
Professor $153,170
Associate Professor $135,750
Assistant Professor $125,303
Instructor $104,389
(74) Research Associate 2 $142,085
(75) Director of Library Services 1 $135,750
(76) Forest Manager 1 $122,249
01/27/2025 1:30:04 PM HAR032

SB129
(77) Associate Librarian 1 $110,077
(78) Assistant Librarian 4 $96,743
(79) Learning Skills Specialist 1 $96,743
(80) Senior Research Assistant 7 $84,371
(81) Graduate Assistant 35 $33,127
NINE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(82) Distinguished Professor 1 $161,829
(83) Faculty 99
Professor $149,687
Associate Professor $132,261
Assistant Professor $121,812
Instructor $100,908
(84) Clinical Associate Professor 2 $132,261
(85) Clinical Assistant Professor 2 $121,812
(86) Clinical Instructor 2 $100,908
(87) Part-Time Faculty 70 $56,046
(88) Graduate Assistant 8 $26,894
TWELVE MONTH AUXILIARY ENTERPRISES
POSITIONS
(89) Director of Athletics 1 $159,847
(90) Head Coach 9 $146,047
(91) Assistant Coach 10 $114,807
(92) Head Athletic Trainer 1 $114,807
(93) Asst. Athl. Dir. for Compliance 1 $114,807
(94) Registered Nurse 1 $81,860
(95) UAM Director of Housing 1 $72,774
(96) Resident Hall Specialist 3 $57,515
(97) Innkeeper Specialist 1 $53,175
(98) Assistant Athletic Trainer 2 $49,548
(99) Resident Hall Manager 1 $49,164
(100) Institutional Services Assistant 8 $42,025
UAM - COLLEGE OF TECHNOLOGY - MCGEHEE
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ADMINISTRATIVE POSITIONS
(101) IT Pool 2
01/27/2025 1:30:04 PM HAR032

SB129
Network Engineer $200,973
Information Systems Manager $128,994
Computer Network Coordinator $128,780
Technical Support Staff $123,019
Coordinator, Academic Computing $121,571
Coord., Administrative Computing $121,570
Coordinator of Information Technology $119,967
Website Developer/Programmer $119,967
System Programmer/Web Developer $118,592
Computer Systems Mgr. $108,987
Database Administrator $106,607
Systems Administrator $105,547
Information Systems Security Specialist $103,579
Institution Information Technology Coord. $101,489
Assistant Database Administrator $97,665
Computer Support Manager $97,585
Information Systems Coordinator $97,585
Senior Software Support Specialist $97,585
Systems Specialist $97,585
Information Technology Manager $96,408
Network Support Specialist $93,831
Senior Software Support Analyst $93,831
Tech Support/Systems Admin. $92,374
Tech Support/Applications Support $92,374
Information Systems Business Manager $90,223
Security Analyst $90,223
Systems Analyst $90,223
Information Technology Specialist $88,339
Computer Support Coordinator $86,753
Software Support Analyst $86,753
Systems Applications Supervisor $86,753
Computer Operations Coordinator $83,416
Systems Coordination Analyst $83,416
PC Support Specialist $81,860
Computer Support Specialist $80,208
Database Analyst $80,208
01/27/2025 1:30:04 PM HAR032

SB129
Digital Broadcast Specialist $77,123
Network Support Analyst $77,123
Website Developer $77,123
Information Systems Analyst $74,157
Information Systems Security Analyst $74,157
Computer Support Analyst $74,157
Software Support Specialist $71,305
Telecommunications Supervisor $71,305
Media Specialist $69,975
Computer Support Technician $68,562
Help Desk Specialist $68,562
Computer Operator $65,925
Network Analyst $65,925
Telecommunications Specialist $65,925
Multimedia Specialist $62,208
Information Technology Assistant $58,608
Computer Lab Technician $56,353
Multimedia Technician $51,130
Audiovisual Laboratory Assistant $47,272
(102) Vice Chancellor 1 $173,915
(103) Project Coordinator 1 $121,923
(104) Business Development Cntr. Coord. 1 $109,882
(105) Director of Vocational Counseling 1 $107,674
(106) Director of Student Activities 1 $100,904
(107) Fiscal Support Pool 1
Fiscal Support Manager $92,082
Fiscal Support Supervisor $75,685
Accountant II $72,774
Accountant I $69,975
Fiscal Support Analyst $67,284
Fiscal Support Specialist $59,815
Accounting Technician $55,302
Fiscal Support Technician $51,130
(108) Public Safety Pool 1
HE Public Safety Commander III $90,223
Director Public Safety I $88,541
01/27/2025 1:30:04 PM HAR032

SB129
HE Public Safety Commander II $86,753
HE Public Safety Commander I $83,416
HE Public Safety Supervisor $74,157
Public Safety Officer $71,305
Public Safety Officer II $65,925
Security Officer Supervisor $62,208
Public Safety/Security Officer $56,353
HE Public Safety Dispatcher $47,272
Parking Control Supv. $47,272
Security Officer $47,272
Parking Control Officer $45,455
Watchman $38,855
(109) Administrative Support Pool 4
Administrative Assistant $67,284
Administrative Analyst $67,284
Administrative Support Supervisor $62,208
Administrative Specialist III $59,815
Administration Support Specialist $59,815
Administrative Specialist II $53,175
Administrative Support Specialist $53,175
Administrative Specialist I $47,272
Extra Help Assistant $38,855
(110) Maintenance Supervisor 1 $67,284
(111) Human Resources Specialist 1 $62,208
(112) Maintenance Assistant 2 $51,130
(113) Institutional Services Assistant 1 $42,025
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(114) Tech. Center Dir. of Instructors 1 $147,011
(115) Workforce Ed. Instructor 8 $111,618
(116) Workforce Ed. Part-time Faculty 10 $53,448
NINE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(117) Workforce Ed. Instructor 15 $74,450
UAM - COLLEGE OF TECHNOLOGY - CROSSETT
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
01/27/2025 1:30:04 PM HAR032

SB129
ADMINISTRATIVE POSITIONS
(118) IT Pool 1
Network Engineer $200,973
Information Systems Manager $128,994
Computer Network Coordinator $128,780
Technical Support Staff $123,019
Coordinator, Academic Computing $121,571
Coord., Administrative Computing $121,570
Coordinator of Information Technology $119,967
Website Developer/Programmer $119,967
System Programmer/Web Developer $118,592
Computer Systems Mgr. $108,987
Database Administrator $106,607
Systems Administrator $105,547
Information Systems Security Specialist $103,579
Institution Information Technology Coord. $101,489
Assistant Database Administrator $97,665
Computer Support Manager $97,585
Information Systems Coordinator $97,585
Senior Software Support Specialist $97,585
Systems Specialist $97,585
Information Technology Manager $96,408
Network Support Specialist $93,831
Senior Software Support Analyst $93,831
Tech Support/Systems Admin. $92,374
Tech Support/Applications Support $92,374
Information Systems Business Manager $90,223
Security Analyst $90,223
Systems Analyst $90,223
Information Technology Specialist $88,339
Computer Support Coordinator $86,753
Software Support Analyst $86,753
Systems Applications Supervisor $86,753
Computer Operations Coordinator $83,416
Systems Coordination Analyst $83,416
PC Support Specialist $81,860
01/27/2025 1:30:04 PM HAR032

SB129
Computer Support Specialist $80,208
Database Analyst $80,208
Digital Broadcast Specialist $77,123
Network Support Analyst $77,123
Website Developer $77,123
Information Systems Analyst $74,157
Information Systems Security Analyst $74,157
Computer Support Analyst $74,157
Software Support Specialist $71,305
Telecommunications Supervisor $71,305
Media Specialist $69,975
Computer Support Technician $68,562
Help Desk Specialist $68,562
Computer Operator $65,925
Network Analyst $65,925
Telecommunications Specialist $65,925
Multimedia Specialist $62,208
Information Technology Assistant $58,608
Computer Lab Technician $56,353
Multimedia Technician $51,130
Audiovisual Laboratory Assistant $47,272
(119) Vice Chancellor 1 $173,915
(120) Project Coordinator 1 $121,923
(121) Business and Industry Coordinator 1 $109,882
(122) Director of Vocational Counseling 1 $107,674
(123) Director of Student Activities 1 $100,904
(124) Fiscal Support Pool 2
Fiscal Support Manager $92,082
Fiscal Support Supervisor $75,685
Accountant II $72,774
Accountant I $69,975
Fiscal Support Analyst $67,284
Fiscal Support Specialist $59,815
Accounting Technician $55,302
Fiscal Support Technician $51,130
(125) Public Safety Pool 1
01/27/2025 1:30:04 PM HAR032

SB129
HE Public Safety Commander III $90,223
Director Public Safety I $88,541
HE Public Safety Commander II $86,753
HE Public Safety Commander I $83,416
HE Public Safety Supervisor $74,157
Public Safety Officer $71,305
Public Safety Officer II $65,925
Public Safety/Security Officer $56,353
HE Public Safety Dispatcher $47,272
Parking Control Supv. $47,272
Security Officer $47,272
Parking Control Officer $45,455
Watchman $38,855
(126) Administrative Support Pool 3
Administrative Assistant $67,284
Administrative Analyst $67,284
Administrative Support Supervisor $62,208
Administrative Specialist III $59,815
Administration Support Specialist $59,815
Administrative Specialist II $53,175
Administrative Support Specialist $53,175
Administrative Specialist I $47,272
Extra Help Assistant $38,855
(127) Maintenance Supervisor 1 $67,284
(128) Institutional Services Assistant 1 $42,025
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(129) Tech. Center Dir. of Instructors 1 $147,011
(130) Workforce Ed. Instructor 3 $111,619
(131) Workforce Ed. Part-time Faculty 18 $53,448
NINE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(132) Workforce Ed. Instructor 17 $74,450
ARKANSAS HEAVY EQUIPMENT OPERATOR
TRAINING ACADEMY - WARREN CENTER
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
01/27/2025 1:30:04 PM HAR032

SB129
ADMINISTRATIVE POSITIONS
(133) Director, AHEOTA 1 $118,723
(134) Administrative Support Pool 1
Administrative Assistant $67,284
Administrative Analyst $67,284
Administrative Support Supervisor $62,208
Administrative Specialist III $59,815
Administration Support Specialist $59,815
Administrative Specialist II $53,175
Administrative Support Specialist $53,175
Administrative Specialist I $47,272
Extra Help Assistant $38,855
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(135) Workforce Ed. Instructor 2 $111,619
(136) AHEOTA Coordinator/Recruiter 1 $90,460
NINE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(137) Workforce Ed. Part-time Faculty 1 $53,448
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 632

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - OPERATIONS - MONTICELLO. There is hereby
authorized, for the University of Arkansas at Monticello for the 2025-2026
fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-time or temporary
employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated
herein for such purposes: seven hundred ninety (790) temporary or part-time
employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the
Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act
for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. EXTRA HELP - OPERATIONS - MCGEHEE. There is hereby
authorized, for the University of Arkansas at Monticello - McGehee for the
2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-time or temporary
employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated
herein for such purposes: thirty-six (36) temporary or part-time employees,
when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform
01/27/2025 1:30:04 PM HAR032

SB129
Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the
appropriate classification.

SECTION 4. EXTRA HELP - OPERATIONS - CROSSETT. There is hereby
authorized, for the University of Arkansas at Monticello - Crossett for the
2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-time or temporary
employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated
herein for such purposes: thirty-six (36) temporary or part-time employees,
when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform
Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the
appropriate classification.

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - STATE OPERATIONS - MONTICELLO. There is
hereby appropriated, to the University of Arkansas at Monticello, to be
payable from the University of Arkansas at Monticello Fund, for personal
services and operating expenses of the University of Arkansas at Monticello
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $11,000,000
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 1,244,640
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 1,881,040
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 100,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) CONTINGENCY 972,032
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $15,197,712

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - CASH FUNDS - MONTICELLO. There is hereby
appropriated, to the University of Arkansas at Monticello, to be payable from
cash funds as defined by Arkansas Code 19-4-801, for personal services and
operating expenses of the University of Arkansas at Monticello for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
01/27/2025 1:30:04 PM HAR032

SB129

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $5,600,000
(02) EXTRA HELP 700,000
(03) OVERTIME 10,000
(04) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 4,400,000
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 6,371,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 50,000
(C) PROF. FEES 900,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 7,000,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(06) CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS 2,500,000
(07) DEBT SERVICE 50,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $27,581,000

SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - STATE OPERATIONS - CENTER FOR FOREST
BUSINESS. There is hereby appropriated, to the University of Arkansas at
Monticello, to be payable from the University of Arkansas at Monticello Fund,
for personal services and operating expenses of the University of Arkansas at
Monticello Center for Forest Business for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $430,000
(02) EXTRA HELP 10,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 175,000
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 197,001
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 20,000
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $832,001
01/27/2025 1:30:04 PM HAR032

SB129

SECTION 8. APPROPRIATION - STATE OPERATIONS - MCGEHEE. There is hereby
appropriated, to the University of Arkansas at Monticello, to be payable from
the University of Arkansas at Monticello Fund, for personal services and
operating expenses of the University of Arkansas at Monticello - McGehee for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $1,600,000
(02) EXTRA HELP 250,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 250,000
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 409,318
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $2,509,318

SECTION 9. APPROPRIATION - CASH FUNDS - MCGEHEE. There is hereby
appropriated, to the University of Arkansas at Monticello, to be payable from
cash funds as defined by Arkansas Code 19-4-801, for personal services and
operating expenses of the University of Arkansas at Monticello - McGehee for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $280,000
(02) EXTRA HELP 100,000
(03) OVERTIME 2,500
(04) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 180,000
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 330,150
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 2,500
(C) PROF. FEES 15,000
01/27/2025 1:30:04 PM HAR032

SB129
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 30,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $940,150

SECTION 10. APPROPRIATION - STATE OPERATIONS - CROSSETT. There is
hereby appropriated, to the University of Arkansas at Monticello, to be
payable from the University of Arkansas at Monticello Fund, for personal
services and operating expenses of the University of Arkansas at Monticello -
Crossett for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $1,125,000
(02) EXTRA HELP 275,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 225,000
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 248,642
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,873,642

SECTION 11. APPROPRIATION - CASH FUNDS - CROSSETT. There is hereby
appropriated, to the University of Arkansas at Monticello, to be payable from
cash funds as defined by Arkansas Code 19-4-801, for personal services and
operating expenses of the University of Arkansas at Monticello - Crossett for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $300,000
(02) EXTRA HELP 75,000
(03) OVERTIME 5,000
(04) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 180,000
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
01/27/2025 1:30:04 PM HAR032

SB129
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 386,160
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 2,500
(C) PROF. FEES 20,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 35,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,003,660

SECTION 12. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, the Higher Education Expenditure Restriction
Act, or their successors, and other fiscal control laws of this State, where
applicable, and regulations promulgated by the Department of Finance and
Administration, as authorized by law, shall be strictly complied with in
disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 13. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 14. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
01/27/2025 1:30:04 PM HAR032

SB129
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.


































01/27/2025 1:30:04 PM HAR032